dev/variation/scn2ipa.twol
Alphabet
a à:a
b b:0
c:0 c:k c:tʃ c:ɕ c:ʃ
ç:s
d:d d:0 d:ɖː d:ɾ đ:d ḍ:d 
e:e e:e é:e è:e ê:e
f
g:l g:ʤ
h:0
i:i i:0 i:j í:i
j
k
l
m m:0
n n:0
o:ɔ
p p:0
q:k
r:ʐ
s:s 
r:ɾ 
š:ʃ
t:t t:0
u u:w ú:u ù:u û:u
v 
w:u
x:ks
y:j
z:0 z:tsː z:ts z:d̪͡z̪
;

Rules

"bb:b" 
b:0 <=> _ b:b ;

"c:0 before qu"
c:0 <=> \n: _ q: u: ;

"c:tsh after n"
c:tʃ <=> n: _ [ i: | e: | è: ] ;

"c:sh before some vowels"
c:ʃ <=> \n: _ [ i: | e: | è: ] ;

"c:k before some vowels"
c:k <=> \n: _ (h:) [ e: | i: | u: | o: | a: ] ;

"dd to d: 1"
d:0 <=> \d:0 _ d:dː ;

"dd to d: 2"
d:ɖː <=> d:0 _ \d:dː ;

"d:ɾ before r"
d:ɾ <=> \d:0 _ r: ;

"g:dzh before i"
g:ʤ <=> _ (h:) i ;

"i:j before vowel"
i:j <=> _ [ a: | e: | i: | o: | u: ] ;

"mm:m"
m:0 <=> _ m:m ;

"nn:n"
n:0 <=> _ n:n ;

"pp:p"
p:0 <=> _ p:p ;

"tt:t"
t:0 <=> _ t:t ;

"u:w after q"
u:w <=> q: _ ;

"zz to ts: 1"
z:0 <=> \z:0 _ z:tsː ;

"zz to ts: 2"
z:tsː <=> z:0 _ \z:tsː ;
